Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 6. Receivers

38-38-601.
Receiver appointed upon application.

When an action or proceeding has been commenced to foreclose a mortgage, trust deed, or other instrument securing an indebtedness, a receiver of the property affected shall be appointed upon application at any time prior to the sale, if it appears that the security is clearly inadequate or that the premises are in danger of being materially injured or reduced in value as security by removal, destruction, deterioration, accumulation of prior liens, or otherwise so as to render the security inadequate.

If the facts would justify the appointment of a receiver under this section but one is not applied for and if the premises are abandoned by the owner thereof, the holder of the lien may take possession until the sale and shall be subject to the same duties and liabilities for the care of the premises and for the application of the rents and profits as would a receiver.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1673, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-39-112, as it existed prior to 1990.

38-38-602.
Appointment of receiver to prevent waste.

During the period of redemption, the owner of the premises or the person in possession shall not commit waste, and the purchaser shall have such action or remedy for waste, including injunction, as he would have as owner of the premises. During such period, the owner of the premises shall keep the premises in repair, shall use reasonable diligence to continue to keep the premises yielding an adequate income, and shall pay current taxes before a penalty accrues and interest becomes due on any prior encumbrance, keep the premises insured for the protection of the holder of the certificate of purchase, and, in case of a leasehold, pay the rent and other sums due under the lease, and failure to do so shall constitute waste. In case of waste committed or danger of waste or an actual probability of the security being rendered inadequate, a receiver may be appointed to take possession and preserve the property at any time after the sale under such foreclosure. A receiver appointed before the sale shall continue after sale unless otherwise directed by the court.

If the facts would justify the appointment of a receiver under this section but one is not applied for and if the premises are abandoned by the owner thereof, the purchaser may take possession and shall be subject to the same duties and liabilities for the care of the premises and for the application of the rents and profits as would a receiver.

Nothing in this article shall restrict the power of the court in the appointment of a receiver pursuant to existing law or pursuant to agreement between the parties.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1674, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-39-113, as it existed prior to 1990.